v11.dix
<pardef n="k/o_v">
        <e><p>
                <l>oVttanu</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVttalYu</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVttiwu</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVttavu</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVttaru</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVtteV</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVttiri</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVtteVnu</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVtteVvu</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwixxAneV</l>
				<r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwixxAlYeV</l>
				<r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwixeV</l>
				<r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwiveV</l>
				<r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwixxAreV</l>
				<r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwixxIya</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwixxIri</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwixxeneV</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwiruveVnu</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwixxeveV</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwiruveVvu</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduxxAneV</l>
				<r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduxxAlYeV</l>
				<r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwaxeV</l>
				<r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwaveV</l>
				<r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwAreV</l>
				<r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwIya</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwwIri</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduviri</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwweneV</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
				<l>oVduveVnu</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduwweveV</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>oVduveVvu</l>
                <r>o<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		
</pardef>
</pardefs>

<e lm="ko"><i>k</i><par n="k/o_v"/></e>
